Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1701.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 701.1. Referendum or Public Hearing Required Prior to Construction or Lease.--(a) Except where the approval of the electors is obtained to incur indebtedness to finance the construction of a school project, the board of school directors 123456789101112131415161718192021 of any school district of the second, third or fourth classes, shall not construct, enter into a contract to construct or enter into a contract to lease a new school building or substantial addition to an existing school building without the consent of the electors obtained by referendum or without holding a public hearing as hereinafter provided. In the event that a new school building or a substantial addition to an existing building is to be constructed or leased, the school board shall, by a majority vote of all its members, authorize a maximum project cost and a maximum building construction cost to be financed by the district or amortized by lease rentals to be paid by the district. Building construction cost shall consist of the cost of all building construction including general construction costs, plumbing, heating, electrical, ventilating and other structural costs, equipment and fixtures and architectural and engineering fees relating thereto, but not including costs for site acquisition and development, rough grading to receive the building, sewage treatment facilities or equivalent capital contributions, and architectural and engineering fees relating thereto. In all cases, a public hearing shall be held not later than thirty (30) days before the school district submits the initial building construction cost estimates to the Department of Education for approval. Notice of the hearing shall be given not later than twenty (20) days before the date of the scheduled hearing. In the event that the maximum building construction cost authorization exceeds the aggregate building expenditure standard hereinafter specified, the aforesaid authorization of the school board shall be submitted to the electors of the school district for their approval within six (6) months prior to submission of the final building construction cost bids to 20250HB1701PN2364 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Department of Education for approval. Such referendum shall be held in the same manner as provided by law for the approval of the incurring of indebtedness by referendum. The question as submitted shall specify the maximum project cost, the maximum building construction cost and the annual sinking fund charge or lease rental to be incurred by the school district and the portion of such charge or rental expected to be reimbursed by the Commonwealth. If the final building construction cost bids to be submitted to the Department of Education for approval are less than the aggregate building expenditure standard hereafter specified but exceed by eight (8) per cent or more the initial building construction cost estimates submitted to the Department for approval, a second public hearing shall be held before the Department shall give its final approval.(b) The applicable aggregate building expenditure standard shall be a total amount calculated for each building or substantial addition, including the addition of administrative space as a secondary building, by multiplying the rated pupil capacity under the approved room schedule by the following: two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800) for each pupil of rated elementary capacity; four thousand two hundred dollars ($4,200) for each pupil of rated secondary capacity in grades seven, eight and nine and five thousand two hundred dollars ($5,200) for each pupil of rated secondary capacity in grades ten, eleven and twelve and five thousand two hundred dollars ($5,200) for each pupil of rated career and technical capacity in grades ten, eleven and twelve to not include the cost of equipment and fixtures in such career and technical schools: Provided, however, That each of the preceding per pupil amounts shall be adjusted by the Department of Education on July 1, 1974; and 20250HB1701PN2364 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 annually thereafter through July 1, 2003, by multiplying said amounts by the ratio of the composite construction cost index compiled and published by the United States Department of Commerce for the preceding calendar year to such index for the next preceding calendar year; and Further Provided, however, That each of the preceding per pupil amounts shall be adjusted by the Department of Education on July 1, 2004; and annually thereafter by multiplying said amounts by the ratio of the Building Cost Index published by the McGraw-Hill Companies for the preceding calendar year to such index for the next preceding calendar year. Rated elementary pupil capacity or rated secondary pupil capacity for any school building shall be the rated pupil capacity determined on the basis of the method used by the Department for school building reimbursement purposes during the school year 1971-1972.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) "Site acquisition" includes the cost of land and mineral rights, demolition and clearing, rights-of-way and related utility relocations, surveys and soils analysis, and the cost of all fees relating thereto.(2) "Site development" includes excavation, grouting or shoring, special foundations for buildings, access roads to site, utilities on site, extension of utilities to site.(3) "Equipment and fixtures" means property fixed or movable which is incidental and necessary to conduct the educational program, and includes, but is not limited to movable equipment such as desks, chairs, tables, portable physical education equipment, audio-visual equipment and science, homemaking, industrial art and business equipment and instructional materials and fixtures such as casework, laboratory equipment, 20250HB1701PN2364 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 kitchen equipment, auditorium seating and any other special fixtures or equipment required to conduct a particular educational program.(4) "Substantial addition" means more than twenty (20) per centum of the area and replacement value of the structure to which the improvement is to be added.Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE VII-ASCHOOL FACILITIESSection 701-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ATHLETIC FACILITY." A LOCKER ROOM, GYMNASIUM, ARENA, POOL, ATHLETIC TRAINING ROOM, WEIGHT ROOM OR ANY OTHER LOCATION USED BY STUDENTS AND THEIR COACHES FOR SPORTS TRAINING, PRACTICE, COMPETITION AND COACHING."Building condition assessment." The updated assessment described under section 705-A."Committee." The Public School Facility Advisory Committee established under section 704-A."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."FACILITY CONDITION ASSESSMENT." THE UPDATED ASSESSMENT DESCRIBED UNDER SECTION 705-A."Public school facility." A structure, building or facility occupied by ownership, lease or other agreement used by a school entity."School entity." A school district, area career and technical school, intermediate unit, cyber charter school, 20250HB1701PN2364 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charter school, chartered school for the education of the deaf or blind or regional charter school operating within this Commonwealth."School infrastructure improvement." The acquisition, demolition, construction, improvement, repair, alteration, modernization, renovation, reconstruction or maintenance of all or any part of a PUBLIC school facility or of any other property necessary for, or ancillary to, a PUBLIC school facility. The term includes site acquisition, site development, the services of design professionals such as engineers and architects, construction management, financing costs and administrative costs and expenses incurred in connection with the project, as well as capital maintenance intended to extend the useful life of a PUBLIC school facility, including upgrades and replacements of building systems such as structure, enclosure, mechanical, plumbing and electrical systems, considered to constitute or be part of a school infrastructure improvement project.Section 702-A. Powers and duties of department.The department shall have the following duties:(1) To the extent funding is available:(i) Provide technical assistance regarding school infrastructure improvement to school entities as determined by the department, requested by the school entity or determined by third-party review.(ii) Assist school entities with securing and leveraging Federal, State and local resources to improve public school facilities.(iii) Contract with one or more third-party vendors to complete the assessment in a timely manner as required PROVIDED under section 705-A(b). 20250HB1701PN2364 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Assist school entities with assessing their infrastructure needs to provide quality, safe, healthy, sustainable, effective and equitable learning and working environments.(3) Coordinate public school facility planning and improvement across Federal and State agencies.(4) Establish and maintain the public school facility inventory required under section 703-A(a).(5) Develop, in consultation with the committee, the criteria for the assessment and subsequent request for a proposal from a third-party vendor to complete the assessment as required PROVIDED under section 705-A(b)(1). Section 703-A. Public school facility inventory.(a) Inventory.--The department shall collect the following information from each school entity for each public school facility:(1) The name of the school entity that occupies each public school facility through ownership, lease or other agreement.(2) The name or address of the public school facility.(3) The grades served in the public school facility, if applicable.(4) The number of students enrolled in the public school facility and a projection for student enrollment growth over 10 years, if applicable.(5) The building capacity limits as established by the Department of Labor and Industry and standardized measures, including the international building code for public school facilities.(6) Whether the public school facility is an 20250HB1701PN2364 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative building, an instructional building, gymnasium , ATHLETIC FACILITY or a maintenance building. (7) The number of stories in the public school facility.(8) The size of the public school facility in square footage. Architectural area and scheduled area shall be calculated in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 349.1 (relating to definitions).(9) If available, the adequacy of instructional space in classrooms designated for learning and whether the space is in alignment with the educational specifications of the public school facility plan.(10) (9) The acreage of the public school facility site. (11) (10) The ownership status of the public school facility, including:(i) Owned by the school entity.(ii) Leased or rented to the school entity, including an indicator of whether the school entity is financially responsible for routine and preventative PUBLIC SCHOOL facility maintenance costs. (12) (11) The age of the public school facility, if known, including dates and brief descriptions of any major renovations or additions. This requirement may be met with a third-party districtwide facility study.(b) Data submission.--No later than April 1, 2027, the department shall establish a form and electronic process for each school entity to submit the information required under subsection (a).(c) Duties.--No later than December 31, 2027, each school entity shall submit the information required under subsection (a) to the department in a form and manner determined by the 20250HB1701PN2364 - 8 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department.(d) Technical assistance.--The department may provide technical assistance to each school entity to ensure a complete inventory under subsection (a).(e) Inventory update.--Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year and every three years thereafter, the department shall require each school entity to review and update the information under subsection (a) as necessary to inform the department of substantial changes in school building use, occupancy, ownership, damages to school buildings or building closures.Section 704-A. Public School Facility Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The Public School Facility Advisory Committee is established within the department.(b) Duties.--The committee shall have the following duties:(1) Make recommendations to the department pertaining to public school facility issues, including program requirements, guidelines, funding structures to support school entities to conduct assessments and address PUBLIC SCHOOL facility deficiencies, regulations and support provided by the department.(2) Periodically review the maintenance of the public school building FACILITY inventory under section 703-A(a) and provide recommendations to the department regarding the maintenance of the inventory.(3) Work in consultation with the department on developing uniform criteria and measures for the assessment.(4) Make recommendations to the department and General Assembly on how to ensure that each school entity addresses REGARDING MEASURES SCHOOL ENTITIES CAN USE TO ADDRESS deficiencies identified in the assessment , including, if 20250HB1701PN2364 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable, the best use of the rating scale developed under section 705-A(a)(2) . (c) Composition.--(1) The committee shall consist of the following members:(i) The following individuals appointed by the Governor:(A) An individual recommended by the Pennsylvania Association of School Business Officials with experience in PUBLIC school facility operations. (B) An individual recommended by the Pennsylvania School Boards Association.(C) An individual recommended by the Pennsylvania Association of School Administrators.(D) An architect recommended by the American Institute of Architects of Pennsylvania with experience in school building projects.(E) An engineer recommended by the Pennsylvania Society of Professional Engineers with experience in school building projects.(F) An individual recommended by the Pennsylvania State Building and Construction Trades Council.(G) An individual jointly recommended by the Pennsylvania State Education Association and the American Federation of Teachers Pennsylvania.(ii) The Secretary of Education or a designee, who shall serve as the chairperson.(iii) The chief administrator for the department's Division of School Facilities.20250HB1701PN2364 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The architect or structural engineer for the department's Division of School Facilities.(v) An individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(vi) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(vii) An individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(viii) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(ix) The executive director of the State Public School Building Authority.(x) A public health official appointed by the Secretary of Health.(xi) An individual appointed by the Secretary of Environmental Protection.(xii) An individual appointed by the chairperson of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(2) If members are not initially appointed within 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph, or within 90 days of a vacancy, the Secretary of Education shall appoint any qualified individual to fill the vacancy.(d) Meetings.--The committee shall:(1) Meet at the call of the chairperson.(2) Hold its first meeting within 45 days of the date that all members are appointed to the committee.(e) Compensation and reimbursement.--The members of the committee shall serve without compensation. Members shall be reimbursed for the necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties.20250HB1701PN2364 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 705-A. Statewide facility condition assessment.(a) Development.--(1) No later than six months after establishment of the committee, the department, in consultation with the committee, shall develop a uniform set of criteria and measures for a request for proposals from third-party vendors to evaluate the condition of the physical attributes and educational suitability of each public school's facilities under subsection (b). The following shall apply:(i) The physical attributes shall include the following:(A) Structural components, including walls, floors, roofs, windows, doors and foundational components.(B) System components, including mechanical, electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilation and air conditioning. An HVAC A HEATING, VENTILATION AND AIR CONDITIONING system evaluation shall be completed and must include:(I) Testing for maximum filter efficiency.(II) Measuring the outside air rate.(III) Verifying ventilation components' operation.(IV) Measuring air distribution through all inlets and outlets.(V) Verifying unit operation and performance of required maintenance in accordance with the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers standards, as the standard is published as of the effective date of 20250HB1701PN2364 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section. The department may identify a successor standard under this subclause and adopt the successor standard.(VI) Verifying control sequences.(VII) Verifying carbon dioxide sensors and acceptable carbon dioxide indoor air concentrations.(C) Interior components, including finishes and fixtures.(D) Exterior components, including finishes and fixtures.(E) Compliance with the requirements in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) in the construction, maintenance and alterations of a public school facility.(F) The physical components of the building that create or have the potential to create:(I) A risk of exposure to environmental hazards, including lead, asbestos and mold.(II) Risk factors determined by the department.(III) A risk of exposure to environmental hazards as determined by the results of testing for environmental hazards inside the public school facility completed within the last five years.(G) ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND PERFORMANCE, INCLUDING FUEL TYPES AND ALTERNATIVE FUEL TYPES USED, ENERGY COSTS OBSERVED PER FUEL TYPE AND OTHER FACTORS 20250HB1701PN2364 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.(H) PHYSICAL SAFETY AND SECURITY ENHANCEMENTS, INCLUDING ANY SECURITY-RELATED TECHNOLOGY AND ANY PHYSICAL SECURITY ASSESSMENTS CONDUCTED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY.(ii) The evaluation may include a record of a recently completed and scheduled major maintenance project specified under section 2604-J(b).(2) No later than September 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with the committee, shall develop guidelines and phases for the third-party request for proposal to determine the relative physical condition of each public school facility. (RESERVED). (b) Assessment.--To the extent that funding is available, but no later than April 1, 2028, the department shall initiate a process to complete an assessment of each public school facility using the criteria and measures developed by the department under subsection (a) in accordance with the following:(1) The department may contract with third-party vendors to complete the assessment.(2) The assessment may be completed in phases if the final phase is completed by June 1, 2031.(c) Report.--(1) No later than 30 90 days after the completion of the assessment, the department shall compile data from the assessment into a report that shall be shared with the members of the committee, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Leader and the Minority Leader of the House of 20250HB1701PN2364 - 14 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) The report shall:(i) Include sufficient information to permit the committee to review the status and scale of need for the improvement and safety of public school facilities across this Commonwealth.(ii) Not include:(A) Building plans or infrastructure records that expose or create vulnerability through the disclosure of the location, configuration or security of crucial systems, including:(I) Public utility systems.(II) Structural elements.(III) Technology.(IV) Communication.(V) Electrical.(VI) Fire suppression.(VII) Ventilation.(VIII) Water.(IX) Wastewater.(X) Sewage.(XI) Gas Systems.(B) Other information that would be exempted from disclosure under section 708 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(D) EXECUTIVE SUMMARY REQUIREMENT.--20250HB1701PN2364 - 15 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) WITHIN 90 DAYS OF RECEIVING A FACILITY CONDITION ASSESSMENT, EACH THIRD-PARTY VENDOR THAT HAS BEEN ASSIGNED TO COMPLETE THE ASSESSMENT FOR A SCHOOL ENTITY AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) SHALL PREPARE AN EXECUTIVE SUMMARY OF THE ASSESSMENT. THE EXECUTIVE SUMMARY SHALL INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING:(I) IDENTIFIED ASBESTOS, MOLD AND LEAD REMEDIATION NEEDS.(II) THE ANTICIPATED DURATION FOR WHICH EACH BUILDING IS PROJECTED TO BE MAINTAINED OR, IF APPLICABLE, EXPANDED IN ORDER TO ACCOMMODATE PROJECTED ENROLLMENT GROWTH OR DECLINE.(III) THE STATUS OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990 (PUBLIC LAW 101-336, 104 STAT. 327) IN THE CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE AND ALTERATIONS OF A PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY.(IV) HEATING, VENTILATION AND AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEMS, IN CLUDING WHETHER THE SYSTEMS EXIST IN EACH BUILDING, AND ANY IDENTIFIED ISSUES RELATED TO HEATING, VENTILATION AND AIR CONDITIONING SYSTEMS, INDOOR AIR QUALITY OR RELATED ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS.(2) THE EXECUTIVE SUMMARY SHALL NOT INCLUDE BUILDING PLANS OR INFRASTRUCTURE RECORDS THAT EXPOSE OR CREATE VULNERABILITY THROUGH THE DISCLOSURE OF THE LOCATION, CONFIGURATION OR SECURITY OF CRUCIAL SYSTEMS, INCLUDING:(I) PUBLIC UTILITY SYSTEMS.(II) STRUCTURAL ELEMENTS.(III) TECHNOLOGY.(IV) COMMUNICATION.(V) ELECTRICAL.20250HB1701PN2364 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (VI) FIRE SUPPRESSION.(VII) VENTILATION.(VIII) WATER.(IX) WASTEWATER.(X) SEWAGE.(XI) GAS SYSTEMS.(XII) OTHER INFORMATION THAT WOULD BE EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE UNDER SECTION 708 OF THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW . (3) EACH SCHOOL DISTRICT SHALL POST THE EXECUTIVE SUMMARY ON THE SCHOOL DISTRICT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. SCHOOL DISTRICTS MAY REDACT INFORMATION FROM THE EXECUTIVE SUMMARY IF THE DISCLOSURE OF WHICH WOULD BE REASONABLY LIKELY TO RESULT IN A SUBSTANTIAL AND DEMONSTRABLE RISK OF PHYSICAL HARM OR THE PERSONAL SECURITY OF STUDENTS OR STAFF. THIS INFORMATION SHALL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW . Section 706-A. Modernization plans.Within one year of its receipt of a facility condition assessment under section 705-A(c) AN EXECUTIVE SUMMARY UNDER SECTION 705-A(D) , each school entity shall develop a plan for the modernization of its PUBLIC SCHOOL facilities based upon the assessment results and shall post the plan on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 707-A. Secure master key box requirement.(a) Secure master key box installation.--(1) All public and private school buildings in this Commonwealth shall have at least one exterior secure master key box that meets Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1037, as that standard is published as of the effective date of 20250HB1701PN2364 - 17 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this paragraph, installed at each school building to permit emergency access by law enforcement from the exterior of a school building. The department may identify a successor standard under this paragraph and adopt the successor standard.(2) The key box shall be capable of securely storing keys to all locked doors within the school building and schematic diagrams of the school building.(3) The school board or governing body of each school shall, in consultation with local law enforcement authorities, determine the precise location for the installation of the secure master key box.(b) Notification and updates.--The school board or governing body of each school shall immediately notify local law enforcement of any changes to the locks, doors or other access control devices on the main entrances or other critical access points of the school building.Section 3. Section 2605-J of the act is repealed:[Section 2605-J. Building condition assessments.(a) Duties of department.--(1) The department shall develop guidelines for school entities to voluntarily report information related to school building safety, inventory and condition. The guidelines shall include a building condition assessment to be voluntarily completed every 10 years for school entities that includes, but is not limited to, a projection of costs to maintain and renovate existing school buildings.(2) The department shall post completed building condition assessments on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB1701PN2364 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The department shall provide additional points under the funding rubric contained in section 2604-J(d) for grants applied for by school entities that complete building condition assessments.(b) Completion incentive.--A school entity that completes a building condition assessment shall receive a 2% increase above the amount calculated under section 2606-J. The department shall develop a process, in coordination with the application process in section 2602-J, for awarding an enhanced reimbursement for completing a building condition assessment.]Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of section 701.1 of the act shall take effect in 60 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1701PN2364 - 19 - 123456789101112131415